Nevada, session 83, SB124.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 630 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.3 and 1.7 of this act.
Sec. 1.3. 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630.161,
the Board may issue a limited license to practice medicine to an
applicant who:
(a) Holds or has held a valid and unrestricted license to
practice medicine issued by a foreign country other than Canada
and has completed a residency program or other program of
postgraduate training in that foreign country or performed the
duties of a physician in that foreign country within the 5 years
immediately preceding the date on which the application is
submitted or within such other time period as the Board deems
acceptable;
(b) Meets the requirements prescribed by the Board with
respect to proficiency in the English language;
(c) Is of good moral character and reputation;
(d) Is in good standing with the foreign regulatory body that
issued the license described in paragraph (a) or, if the applicant is
no longer licensed by the foreign regulatory body, was in good
standing with the regulatory body at the time in which the license
of the applicant expired or was otherwise deactivated at the
request of the applicant;
(e) Is a graduate of a foreign medical school whose
curriculum is judged to be acceptable by the Board; and
(f) Has passed all steps of the United States Medical Licensing
Examination.
2. In addition to the requirements established pursuant to
subsection 1, the Board may:
(a) Require an applicant who has not performed the duties of a
physician for a continuous period of 24 months immediately
preceding the date on which the applicant submits the application
to complete an examination prescribed by the Board similar to the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Step 2 clinical skills exam of the United States Medical Licensing
Examination to evaluate the clinical skills of the applicant to
practice medicine.
(b) Upon licensure of the applicant, require the applicant to
provide to the Board notification of an offer for employment as a
physician:
(1) At a federally-qualified health center;
(2) From the State or a political subdivision thereof, which
may include, without limitation, a county hospital, a health district
created pursuant to NRS 439.362 or 439.370, a medical school
within the Nevada System of Higher Education or a facility
operated by a division of the Department of Health and Human
Services;
(3) At a nonprofit facility which provides mental or
behavioral health services or primary care services; or
(4) From a physician group practice located in a medically
underserved area of this State.
3. The holder of a limited license issued pursuant to this
section:
(a) Shall file with the Board for approval a written practice
agreement between the limited licensee and each physician
supervising him or her pursuant to paragraph (b).
(b) Except if authorized in emergency or life threatening
situations by the regulations adopted pursuant to this section, shall
not practice medicine except:
(1) Under the supervision and control of a physician who
holds an active unrestricted license to practice medicine in this
State, practices in the same or a substantially similar specialty as
the limited licensee and has practiced in that same or similar
specialty for at least 2 years.
(2) In accordance with the applicable written practice
agreement filed with and approved by the Board pursuant to
paragraph (a).
(c) Shall inform the Board of any change in the employment
status of the limited licensee.
4. A physician supervising a holder of a limited license
pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Is responsible for any act that constitutes the practice of
medicine by the limited licensee; and
(b) Shall continuously monitor, periodically evaluate and, if
required by the Board, report to the Board information relating to
the performance and competence of the limited licensee.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
5. The holder of a limited license granted pursuant to this
section may be disciplined by the Board at any time for any of the
grounds provided in NRS 630.161 or 630.301 to 630.3065,
inclusive.
6. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630.161, the Board
may issue an unrestricted license to practice medicine upon the
submission of an application by the holder of a limited license
issued pursuant to this section who:
(a) Has completed at least 2 years of practice as a full-time
physician under the limited license;
(b) Is in good standing in this State; and
(c) Has received a written recommendation from each
physician currently supervising the holder of a limited license
pursuant to subsection 3 which states:
(1) That the limited licensee has met all requirements
established by the Board for the evaluation of limited licensees
licensed pursuant to this section, if applicable; and
(2) In the opinion of the supervising physician, the limited
licensee is qualified to independently practice medicine.
7. The Board may, after providing the holder of a limited
license issued pursuant to this section with notice and an
opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter and chapter 622A of NRS, suspend or revoke the license
issued to the limited licensee if the Board determines that the
limited licensee is no longer employed as a physician in this State.
8. The Board:
(a) Shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section, including, without limitation,
regulations:
(1) Establishing the required provisions of a written
practice agreement entered into between the holder of a limited
license and his or her supervising physician pursuant to
subsection 3;
(2) Governing the prescribing and dispensing of controlled
substances by limited licensees, which must prohibit a limited
licensee from prescribing or dispensing any controlled substance
that the supervising physician of the limited licensee is not
authorized or qualified to prescribe or dispense; and
(3) Establishing the specialties within which a limited
licensee may practice pursuant to this section, which may include,
without limitation, internal medicine, general medicine, geriatric
medicine, family medicine, palliative medicine and hospice.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(b) May adopt such additional regulations as it deems
appropriate to carry out the provisions of this section, which may
include, without limitation:
(1) Any additional requirements for the issuance or
renewal of a limited license under the provisions of this section;
(2) Regulations governing the scope of practice of a limited
licensee, including, without limitation, regulations prescribing the
authority of a limited licensee to order home health care;
(3) Requirements for the identification of limited licensees,
which may include, without limitation, a requirement that a
limited licensee wear an identification badge which clearly
identifies the person as a limited licensee;
(4) Criteria for the monitoring and evaluation of a limited
licensee by the supervising physician of the limited licensee
pursuant to subsection 4; and
(5) Regulations concerning the types of procedures or
services which a limited licensee may perform outside of the
presence of his or her supervising physician, which may exempt a
limited licensee from the requirements of paragraph (b) of
subsection 3 in emergency or life threatening situations.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Federally-qualified health center” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(1)(2)(B).
(b) “Medically underserved area” means an area designated
as:
(1) A health professional shortage area for primary care by
the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 254e; or
(2) An area with a medically underserved population by the
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant
to 42 U.S.C. § 254b.
(c) “Physician group practice” means any business entity
organized for the purpose of the practice of medicine or
osteopathic medicine by more than one physician.
Sec. 1.7. On or before January 31 of each calendar year, the
Board shall:
1. Compile a report concerning the licenses issued pursuant
to section 1.3 of this act which must include, for the immediately
preceding calendar year:
(a) The number of applications received by the Board for
limited licenses pursuant to subsection 1;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(b) The number of applications received by the Board from the
holders of limited licenses for an unrestricted license pursuant to
subsection 6 of section 1.3 of this act;
(c) An evaluative assessment of the quality of the limited
licensees licensed pursuant to this section; and
(d) Metrics and data concerning, without limitation, the types
of practices and facilities that employ limited licensees licensed
pursuant to section 1.3 of this act, the specialties practiced by such
limited licensees and the geographic distribution of such limited
licensees.
2. Submit the report compiled pursuant to subsection 1 to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(a) In even-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services; and
(b) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature.
Sec. 2. NRS 630.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.160 1. Every person desiring to practice medicine must,
before beginning to practice, procure from the Board a license
authorizing the person to practice.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630.1605 to 630.161,
inclusive, and 630.258 to 630.2665, inclusive, and sections 1.3 and
1.7 of this act, a license may be issued to any person who:
(a) Has received the degree of doctor of medicine from a
medical school:
(1) Approved by the Liaison Committee on Medical
Education of the American Medical Association and Association of
American Medical Colleges; or
(2) Which provides a course of professional instruction
equivalent to that provided in medical schools in the United States
approved by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education;
(b) Is currently certified by a specialty board of the American
Board of Medical Specialties and who agrees to maintain the
certification for the duration of the licensure, or has passed:
(1) All parts of the examination given by the National Board
of Medical Examiners;
(2) All parts of the Federation Licensing Examination;
(3) All parts of the United States Medical Licensing
Examination;
(4) All parts of a licensing examination given by any state or
territory of the United States, if the applicant is certified by a
specialty board of the American Board of Medical Specialties;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(5) All parts of the examination to become a licentiate of the
Medical Council of Canada; or
(6) Any combination of the examinations specified in
subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3) that the Board determines to be
sufficient;
(c) Is currently certified by a specialty board of the American
Board of Medical Specialties in the specialty of emergency
medicine, preventive medicine or family medicine and who agrees
to maintain certification in at least one of these specialties for the
duration of the licensure, or:
(1) Has completed 36 months of progressive postgraduate:
(I) Education as a resident in the United States or Canada
in a program approved by the Board, the Accreditation Council for
Graduate Medical Education, the Royal College of Physicians and
Surgeons of Canada, the Collège des médecins du Québec or the
College of Family Physicians of Canada, or, as applicable, their
successor organizations; or
(II) Fellowship training in the United States or Canada
approved by the Board or the Accreditation Council for Graduate
Medical Education;
(2) Has completed at least 36 months of postgraduate
education, not less than 24 months of which must have been
completed as a resident after receiving a medical degree from a
combined dental and medical degree program approved by the
Board; or
(3) Is a resident who is enrolled in a progressive postgraduate
training program in the United States or Canada approved by the
Board, the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education,
the Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada, the
Collège des médecins du Québec or the College of Family
Physicians of Canada, or, as applicable, their successor
organizations, has completed at least 24 months of the program and
has committed, in writing, to the Board that he or she will complete
the program; and
(d) Passes a written or oral examination, or both, as to his or her
qualifications to practice medicine and provides the Board with a
description of the clinical program completed demonstrating that the
applicant’s clinical training met the requirements of paragraph (a).
3. The Board may issue a license to practice medicine after the
Board verifies, through any readily available source, that the
applicant has complied with the provisions of subsection 2. The
verification may include, but is not limited to, using the Federation
Credentials Verification Service. If any information is verified by a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
source other than the primary source of the information, the Board
may require subsequent verification of the information by the
primary source of the information.
4. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the
contrary, if, after issuing a license to practice medicine, the Board
obtains information from a primary or other source of information
and that information differs from the information provided by the
applicant or otherwise received by the Board, the Board may:
(a) Temporarily suspend the license;
(b) Promptly review the differing information with the Board as
a whole or in a committee appointed by the Board;
(c) Declare the license void if the Board or a committee
appointed by the Board determines that the information submitted
by the applicant was false, fraudulent or intended to deceive the
Board;
(d) Refer the applicant to the Attorney General for possible
criminal prosecution pursuant to NRS 630.400; or
(e) If the Board temporarily suspends the license, allow the
license to return to active status subject to any terms and conditions
specified by the Board, including:
(1) Placing the licensee on probation for a specified period
with specified conditions;
(2) Administering a public reprimand;
(3) Limiting the practice of the licensee;
(4) Suspending the license for a specified period or until
further order of the Board;
(5) Requiring the licensee to participate in a program to
correct an alcohol or other substance use disorder;
(6) Requiring supervision of the practice of the licensee;
(7) Imposing an administrative fine not to exceed $5,000;
(8) Requiring the licensee to perform community service
without compensation;
(9) Requiring the licensee to take a physical or mental
examination or an examination testing his or her competence to
practice medicine;
(10) Requiring the licensee to complete any training or
educational requirements specified by the Board; and
(11) Requiring the licensee to submit a corrected application,
including the payment of all appropriate fees and costs incident to
submitting an application.
5. If the Board determines after reviewing the differing
information to allow the license to remain in active status, the action
of the Board is not a disciplinary action and must not be reported to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
any national database. If the Board determines after reviewing the
differing information to declare the license void, its action shall be
deemed a disciplinary action and shall be reportable to national
databases.
Sec. 3. NRS 630.195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.195 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630.1606
and 630.1607, in addition to the other requirements for licensure, an
applicant for a license to practice medicine who is a graduate of a
foreign medical school shall submit to the Board proof that the
applicant has received:
(a) The degree of doctor of medicine or its equivalent, as
determined by the Board; and
(b) The [standard] certificate of the Educational Commission for
Foreign Medical Graduates . [or a written statement from that
Commission that the applicant passed the examination given by the
Commission.]
2. The proof of the degree of doctor of medicine or its
equivalent must be submitted directly to the Board by the medical
school that granted the degree. If proof of the degree is unavailable
from the medical school that granted the degree, the Board may
accept proof from any other source specified by the Board.
Sec. 4. NRS 630.265 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.265 1. Unless the Board denies such licensure pursuant
to NRS 630.161 or for other good cause, the Board shall issue to a
qualified applicant a limited license to practice medicine as a
resident physician in a graduate program approved by the
Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education if the
applicant is:
(a) A graduate of an accredited medical school in the United
States or Canada; or
(b) A graduate of a foreign medical school and [has received the
standard certificate of] is certified by the Educational Commission
for Foreign Medical Graduates . [or a written statement from that
Commission that the applicant passed the examination given by it.]
2. The medical school or other institution sponsoring the
program shall provide the Board with written confirmation that the
applicant has been appointed to a position in the program. A limited
license remains valid only while the licensee is actively practicing
medicine in the residency program and is legally entitled to work
and remain in the United States.
3. The Board may issue a limited license for not more than 1
year but may renew the license if the applicant for the limited
license meets the requirements set forth by the Board by regulation.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
4. The holder of a limited license may practice medicine only
in connection with his or her duties as a resident physician or under
such conditions as are approved by the director of the program.
5. The holder of a limited license granted pursuant to this
section may be disciplined by the Board at any time for any of the
grounds provided in NRS 630.161 or 630.301 to 630.3065,
inclusive.
Sec. 5. NRS 630A.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.270 1. An applicant for a license to practice
homeopathic medicine who is a graduate of a foreign medical
school shall submit to the Board through its Secretary-Treasurer
proof that the applicant:
(a) Has received the degree of doctor of medicine or its
equivalent, as determined by the Board, from a foreign medical
school recognized by the Educational Commission for Foreign
Medical Graduates;
(b) Has completed 3 years of postgraduate training satisfactory
to the Board;
(c) Has completed an additional 6 months of postgraduate
training in homeopathic medicine;
(d) [Has received the standard certificate of] Is certified by the
Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates; and
(e) Has passed all parts of the Federation Licensing Examination
. [, or has received a written statement from the Educational
Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates that the applicant has
passed the examination given by the Commission.]
2. In addition to the proofs required by subsection 1, the Board
may take such further evidence and require such further proof of the
professional and moral qualifications of the applicant as in its
discretion may be deemed proper.
3. If the applicant is a diplomate of an approved specialty
board recognized by this Board, the requirements of paragraphs (b)
and (c) of subsection 1 may be waived by the Board.
4. Before issuance of a license to practice homeopathic
medicine, the applicant who presents the proof required by
subsection 1 shall appear personally before the Board and
satisfactorily pass a written or oral examination, or both, as to his or
her qualifications to practice homeopathic medicine.
Sec. 6. NRS 630A.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.320 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
630A.225, the Board may issue to a qualified applicant a limited
license to practice homeopathic medicine as a resident homeopathic
physician in a postgraduate program of clinical training if:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(a) The applicant is a graduate of an accredited medical school
in the United States or Canada or is a graduate of a foreign medical
school recognized by the Educational Commission for Foreign
Medical Graduates and has completed 1 year of supervised clinical
training approved by the Board.
(b) The Board approves the program of clinical training, and the
medical school or other institution sponsoring the program provides
the Board with written confirmation that the applicant has been
appointed to a position in the program.
2. In addition to the requirements of subsection 1, an applicant
who is a graduate of a foreign medical school must [have received
the standard certificate of] be certified by the Educational
Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates.
3. The Board may issue this limited license for not more than 1
year, but may renew the license.
4. The holder of this limited license may practice homeopathic
medicine only in connection with his or her duties as a resident
physician and shall not engage in the private practice of
homeopathic medicine.
5. A limited license granted under this section may be revoked
by the Board at any time for any of the grounds set forth in NRS
630A.225 or 630A.340 to 630A.380, inclusive.
Sec. 6.5. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 7. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 6, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)